Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2067.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; infrastructure and transportation projects The following amounts are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the city of Apache Junction for the following transportation and infrastructure projects: 1. $2,700,000 to widen Tomahawk Road between U.S. Route 60 and Southern Avenue. 2. $6,700,000 to improve Delaware Drive between 16th Avenue and Broadway Avenue with safety and drainage improvements. 3. $1,000,000 to the pavement preservation program in Apache Junction. 4. $12,000,000 for street and drainage projects in Apache Junction. 5. $5,000,000 for improvements to the Ironwood Drive corridor. 6. $2,000,000 for safety improvements at the intersection of Idaho Road and U.S. Route 60.